Maine, session 132, LD1128.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §12522, sub-§4, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 671, §13, is
amended to read:
B. A naturopathic doctor may only prescribe noncontrolled legend drugs from the
following categories: homeopathic remedies, vitamins and minerals, hormones, local
anesthesia and immunizations that are designated by rule by a subcommittee of the
board consisting of the naturopathic members, the pharmacist member and the
allopathic or osteopathic physician member, as consistent with a naturopathic doctor's
education and training. A naturopathic doctor may not prescribe psychotropic
medications.
Sec. 2. Board of Complementary Health Care Providers to adopt rules. No
later than January 1, 2026, as authorized by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 32, section
12522, subsection 4, paragraph B, the formulary subcommittee of the Board of
Complementary Health Care Providers shall update the formulary for naturopathic doctors
and the Board of Complementary Health Care Providers shall adopt the formulary by rule.
Page 1 - 132LR0606(03)

Prior to making final recommendation to the Board of Complementary Health Care
Providers on an update to the formulary, the formulary subcommittee shall consult with
pharmacist members of the Maine Board of Pharmacy. Rules adopted by the Board of
Complementary Health Care Providers pursuant to this section are major substantive rules
as required by Title 32, section 12506.
Sec. 3. Authority to report out bill. The Joint Standing Committee on Health
Coverage, Insurance and Financial Services may report out a bill to the Second Regular
Session of the 132nd Legislature relating to the prescriptive authority of naturopathic
doctors.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR0606(03)